Hawaii statutes.
§425-168 Fee for recording. (a) The
director shall collect the following fees for the following limited liability
partnership documents:

(1) Annual report, $25;

(2) Statement of qualification, $50;

(3) Statement of foreign qualification, $100;

(4) Statement of correction, amendment, restatement,
or amendment and restatement, $25;

(5) Certificate of good standing, $5;

(6) Articles of conversion or merger, $100;

(7) For any other certificate, statement, or
document, $25;

(8) Certification of domestic or foreign partnership,
$10; and

(9) For filings relating to registered agents, the
fees established by section 425R-2.

(b) The following special handling fees shall
be assessed by the director for expeditious handling and review of the
following documents:

(1) Statement of qualification, $25;

(2) Statement of correction, amendment, restatement,
or amendment and restatement, $25;

(3) Annual report, $25;

(4) Certification of domestic or foreign limited
liability partnership, $10;

(5) Certificate of good standing for domestic or
foreign limited liability partnership, $10;

(6) Articles of conversion or merger for domestic or
foreign limited liability partnership, $75;

(7) Statement of foreign qualification, $25;

(8) Statement of correction, amendment, restatement,
or amendment and restatement of foreign limited liability partnership, $25;

(9) Annual report, $25; and

(10) For any other certificate or document authorized
by this subpart, $25.

(c) The director shall charge and collect:

(1) For furnishing a certified copy of any document,
instrument, or paper relating to a limited liability partnership, $10 for the
certificate and affixing the seal thereto; and

(2) At the time of any service of process on the
director as agent for service of process of a limited liability partnership,
$10, which amount may be recovered as taxable costs by the party to the suit or
action causing the service to be made if the party prevails in the suit or
action.

(d) All fees collected under this section
shall be managed in accordance with section 26-9(l). [L 2000, c 218, pt of §1;
am L 2001, c 129, §74; am L 2002, c 130, §94; am L 2004, c 116, §7 and c 117,
§4; am L 2009, c 55, §39]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next